Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.040

Commissions—Organization—Meeting—Rules.

The commission shall elect its own chair and create and fill such other offices as it may determine it requires. The commission shall hold at least one regular meeting in each month for not less than nine months in each year. It shall adopt rules for transaction of business and shall keep a written record of its meetings, resolutions, transactions, findings and determinations which record shall be a public record.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2115; 1965 c 7 s 35.63.040. Prior: 1935 c 44 s 3; RRS s 9322-3.]